Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2036.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5332YH (4) 91 dg/ko H.F. 2036 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 237D.1 Foster parent addresses ââ 1 confidentiality. 2 1. For purposes of this chapter: 3 a. âAddressâ means the residential address of a person. 4 b. âChild foster careâ means the same as defined in section 5 237.1. 6 c. âFoster childâ means a child receiving child foster care. 7 d. âFoster parentâ means an individual licensee as defined 8 in section 237.1. 9 2. A person shall not knowingly provide or make available 10 a document to a biological parent of a foster child if the 11 document contains the unredacted address of the foster parent 12 who is currently providing child foster care to the foster 13 child. 14 3. Notwithstanding subsection 2, a document may contain 15 a foster parentâs unredacted address if the foster parent 16 provides written consent to divulge the address to a foster 17 childâs biological parent prior to a person providing the 18 document or making the document available to the biological 19 parent. 20